Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Licensure and Certification of Active Duty Military and Spouses

12.355.
Renewal of professional license or certification held by active duty member of Armed Forces.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, any member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty who, at the time of activation, was:

A member in good standing with any administrative body of the state; and

Duly licensed or certified to engage in his or her profession or vocation in the Commonwealth;

shall be kept in good standing by the administrative body with which he or she is licensed or certified.

While a licensee or certificate holder is an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the license or certificate referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be renewed without:

The payment of dues or fees;

Obtaining continuing education credits when:

Circumstances associated with military duty prevent obtaining training and a waiver request has been submitted to the appropriate administrative body; or

The active duty military member performs the licensed or certified occupation as part of his or her military duties as annotated in Defense Department form 214 (DD 214); or

Performing any other act typically required for the renewal of the license or certificate.

The license or certificate issued under this section shall be continued as long as the licensee or certificate holder is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty and for a period of at least six (6) months after discharge from active duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 101, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

12.357.
Issuance of temporary or regular license or certificate to spouse of active duty member of Armed Forces.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, an administrative body shall issue, without requiring the payment of dues or fees, a temporary or regular license or certificate within thirty (30) days to the spouse of a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States if the spouse of the service member meets the statutory requirements of the administrative body and applies to the administrative body in a format promulgated in administrative regulation by the administrative body.

An application for temporary or regular licensure of the spouse of a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States shall include but not be limited to the following:

Proof that the applicant is married to a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States;

Proof that the applicant holds a valid license or certificate for the profession issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States; and

Proof that the applicant’s spouse is assigned to a duty station in this state.

A temporary license issued pursuant to this section shall expire six (6) months after the date of issuance and is not renewable.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an administrative body shall initially issue or renew any regular occupational license to the spouse of a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States if:

The spouse meets the statutory requirements for initial issuance or renewal of the occupational license by the administrative body;

The spouse applies for the initial issuance or renewal of the occupational license to the administrative body in a format promulgated in administrative regulation by the administrative body; and

The spouse’s application for the initial issuance or renewal of the occupational license is submitted to the administrative body before the regular application deadline for the original license or renewal.

An administrative body that requires payment of dues or fees for the submission of an electronic application for an occupational license shall, within thirty (30) days, refund the dues or fees paid by a spouse of a current member of the Armed Forces of the United States if the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 101, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2022 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.